Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Transportation and Tourism Interagency Committee

177.107.
Transportation and Tourism Interagency Committee — Purpose.

The Transportation and Tourism Interagency Committee is established to foster close collaboration between the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet and the Transportation Cabinet on policies that affect the tourism industry and to place strong emphasis on the coordination of mutual interests such as highway signage, scenic byways, highway safety, and concern for the Commonwealth’s beauty and heritage.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 334, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 95, § 40, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 54, effective June 25, 2009.

177.108.
Membership of Transportation and Tourism Interagency Committee — Compensation — Officers — Meetings — Proxy voting.

The Transportation and Tourism Interagency Committee shall be composed of thirteen (13) members or their official appointed designees, as follows:

Six (6) members appointed by the secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet;

Six (6) members appointed by the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet; and

One (1) member appointed by the executive director of the Kentucky Heritage Council.

Committee members shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be entitled to reimbursement for all reasonable expenses necessarily incurred in connection with the performance of their duties and functions as committee members.

The committee shall elect its chair and vice chair from representatives of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage and Transportation Cabinets for a term of one (1) year. The vice chair shall succeed the chair. The chair shall alternately be a representative of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage and Transportation Cabinets.

The committee shall meet upon the call of the chair and upon the request of the secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet or the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet.

A committee member may appoint a proxy for an individual meeting, delegating to the proxy the privilege of voting on any issue. The proxy appointment shall be in writing.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 334, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 95, § 41, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 55, effective June 25, 2009.

177.109.
Duties and responsibilities.

The Transportation and Tourism Interagency Committee shall have but not be limited to the following duties and responsibilities:

Review Kentucky’s signage laws, administrative regulations, and policies implementing the federal “Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices” and submit any proposed revisions to the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet;

Seek public comment on Kentucky’s signage laws, administrative regulations, and policies;

Advise the Transportation Cabinet on the scenic byways and highways program;

Review and make recommendations on requests for highway signage from tourism-related entities;

Coordinate development of the tourism information potential of welcome centers and rest areas through such means as interactive videos, information kiosks, and highway advisory radio transmitters, as well as other innovative methods which may be identified by the committee;

Monitor developments across the United States relating to billboards and official signs;

Report to the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet and to the secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet on issues of mutual interest to the cabinets;

Serve as an advisory committee on issues identified by the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet and secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet; and

Report committee recommendations to the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, the secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, the secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet, and the secretary of the Executive Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 334, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 95, § 42, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 211, § 115, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 11, § 59, effective June 25, 2009; 2009, ch. 16, § 56, effective June 25, 2009; 2022 ch. 236, § 91, effective July 1, 2022.